Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202685-177
College of Law; state publications; additional copies; requisition.

In order to enable the library of the College of Law to augment its collections, the librarian of the College of Law of the University of Nebraska is authorized to requisition from the respective officer having custody thereof up to one hundred copies of the following state publications: Legislative Journals, Session Laws, replacement volumes and supplements to the Revised Statutes, and Opinions of the Attorney General. The copies of the Legislative Journals, Session Laws, and replacement volumes and supplements to the Revised Statutes may be provided in print or electronic format as the Clerk of the Legislature determines, upon approval of the Executive Board of the Legislative Council.

Laws 1947, c. 185, § 2, p. 611;

Laws 1951, c. 345, § 3, p. 1133;

Laws 1961, c. 243, § 5, p. 727;

Laws 1995, LB 271, § 10;

Laws 2000, LB 534, § 8;

Laws 2015, LB301, § 5;

Laws 2023, LB799, § 12;

Laws 2026, LB1236, § 23.
January 1, 2027